src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 157
 +Inf:%>blive # ;
 +Inf:%>bliva # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bliv # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>blivast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bleiv # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bliven # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj:%>blivande # ;
 +Imp:%>bliv # ;

LEXICON 157K1
 +Inf:%>blive # ;
 +Inf:%>bliva # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bliv # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>blivas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bleiv # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bliven # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>blivi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj:%>blivande # ;
 +Imp:%>bliv # ;

LEXICON 157K2
 +Inf:%>blive # ;
 +Inf:%>bliva # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bliver # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>blivas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bleiv # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bliven # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>blivi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj:%>blivande # ;
 +Imp:%>bliv # ;

LEXICON 157KL
 +Inf:%>blive # ;
 +Inf:%>bliva # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bliver # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>blivast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bleiv # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>blive # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bliven # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>blivi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>blivne # ;
 +Adj:%>blivande # ;
 +Imp:%>bliv # ;

LEXICON 158
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 158K1
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 158K2
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 158KL
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 159
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 159K1
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 159K2
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 159KL
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ide # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>iden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>idi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idne # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 160
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 160K1
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 160K2
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 160KL
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 161
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 161K1
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>id # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 161K2
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 161KL
 +Inf:%>ide # ;
 +Inf:%>ida # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ider # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>idast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eid # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>idt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>idd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>idde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>idde # ;
 +Adj:%>idande # ;
 +Imp:%>id # ;

LEXICON 163
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 163K1
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 163K2
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 163KL
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 164
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 164K1
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 164K2
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 164KL
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ei # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;
