src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
angripe+V:angr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=1988
avvike+V:avv 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4755
begripe+V:begr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=5948
beskrive+V:beskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=6551
bide+V:b 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=6806
bite+V:b 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=7442
blankslite+V:blanksl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=7723
blive+V:bl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=8015
bælskrike+V:bælskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=12045
drite+V:dr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=15236
drive+V:dr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=15257
fise+V:f 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=21803
fline+V:fl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=22906
fordrive+V:fordr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24127
forgripe+V:forgr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24361
framskrive+V:framskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=26007
fråskrive+V:fråskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=27203
fråvike+V:fråv 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=27238
føregripe+V:føregr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=28193
føreskrive+V:føreskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=28324
glide+V:gl 160 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31142
gline+V:gl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31184
godskrive+V:godskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31661
grine+V:gr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32546
gripe+V:gr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32557
illskrike+V:illskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40604
illsvide+V:illsv 160 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40607
innskrive+V:innskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41700
kaldfline+V:kaldfl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44188
klipe+V:kl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=47496
klive+V:kl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=47542
knipe+V:kn 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48210
kvine+V:kv 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52999
lite+V:l 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=55848
maskinskrive+V:maskinskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59519
medunderskrive+V:medunderskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59965
mige+V:m 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=60828
niskrike+V:niskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64652
nite+V:n 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64670
omskrive+V:omskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66708
oppdrive+V:oppdr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66999
overdrive+V:overdr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68068
overskride+V:overskr 159 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68360
overstige+V:overst 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68380
pipe+V:p 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=70020
ramskrike+V:ramskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=73248
reinskrive+V:reinskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=74064
ride+V:r 159 ; ! LEMMA_ID=74998
rise+V:r 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=75271
rive+V:r 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=75353
sige+V:s 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=79592
sigrine+V:sigr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=79691
sike+V:s 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=79707
skadebite+V:skadeb 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81110
skambite+V:skamb 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81266
skine+V:sk 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81856
skite+V:sk 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82076
sklide+V:skl 159 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82736
skride+V:skr 161 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83679
skrike+V:skr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83731
skrive+V:skr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83776
skuldskrive+V:skuldskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84222
skyldskrive+V:skyldskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84223
slite+V:sl 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85736
smite+V:sm 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86277
snide+V:sn 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86797
snike+V:sn 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86811
sprengride+V:sprengr 161 ; ! LEMMA_ID=88764
stige+V:st 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89850
storskrike+V:storskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=90442
stride+V:str 161 ; ! LEMMA_ID=90854
svide+V:sv 159 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92767
svike+V:sv 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92792
svive+V:sv 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92931
trive+V:tr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=99281
underdrive+V:underdr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=103959
underskrive+V:underskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104172
vike+V:v 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110905
vrine+V:vr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=112420
rine+V:r 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115247
lausrive+V:lausr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123070
tilskrive+V:tilskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=127479
avskrive+V:avskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128183
mareride+V:marer 159 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130887
pågripe+V:pågr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=132771
hylskrike+V:hylskr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137651
inndrive+V:inndr 164 ; ! LEMMA_ID=138273
